District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “Net Zero Modification and Preservation Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Green Building Act of 2006, effective March 8, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-234; D.C.
Official Code § 6-1451.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.01) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) “Addition” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in the Building Codes.”.
(2) Existing paragraph (2A) is redesignated as paragraph (2B)
(3) A new paragraph (2A) is added to read as follows:
“(2A) “Aquatic center” means a structure intended for swimming or recreational
bathing that contains water over 24 inches deep and includes the pool, decks, surrounding structure,
locker rooms, electrical and mechanical rooms, and IT controls that support the pool.”.
(4) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A) “Building Codes” means the portions of the Construction Codes designated as
the Building Code and the Existing Building Code.”.
(5) Paragraphs (6) and (7) are amended to read as follows:
“(6) “Construction Codes” shall have the same meaning as in section 2(2) of the
Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986, effective March 21, 1987 (D.C. Law 6-
216; D.C. Official Code § 6-1401(2)).
“(7) “Construction documents” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in the Building
Codes.”.
1

(6) Paragraph (8) is repealed.
(7) Paragraph (14) is amended to read as follows:
“(14) “Existing building” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in the Building Codes.”.
(8) Paragraph (22) is amended to read as follows:
“(22) “Gross floor area” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in the Building Codes.”.
(9) A new paragraph (31B) is added to read as follows:
“(31B) “Level 3 alteration” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in the Building
Codes.”.
(10) A new paragraph (32C) is added to read as follows:
“(32C) “Natatorium” means a building or complex housing one or more indoor pools
featuring HVAC and humidity controls to manage the environment.”.
(11) Paragraph (40A) is amended to read as follows:
“(40A) “Temporary building” means a:
“(A) Trailer; or
“(B) Structure that is used or intended for supporting or sheltering any use or
occupancy on a non-permanent timeframe for an interim use during construction of a permanent
structure.”.
(b) Section 3(a) (D.C. Official Code § 6-1451.02(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language of paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase
“substantial improvement” and inserting the phrase “Level 3 alterations” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (C) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (D) is amended to read as follows:
“(D) Maintain net zero energy compliance unless the project is for the
construction of:
“(i) A temporary building;
“(ii) An addition less than 10,000 square feet;
“(iii) A police, fire, emergency response, or Office of Unified
Communications facility; provided, that the facility need not comply with energy conservation and
obtainment standards otherwise required by section 2(a)(3)(A) and (B) of the Clean Energy DC
Building Code Amendment Act of 2022, effective September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-177; D.C.
Official Code § 6-1453.01(a)(3)(A) and (B)) (“Clean Energy DC Building Act”), until the effective
date of the final regulations issued by the Mayor pursuant to section 2(b)(1) of the Clean Energy DC
Building Act (D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01(b)(1));
“(iv) A natatorium; provided, that the aquatics center in which the
natatorium is located need not comply with energy conservation and obtainment standards otherwise
required by section 2(a)(3)(A) and(B) of the Clean Energy DC Building Act (D.C. Official Code § 6-
1453.01(a)(3)(A) and (B)), until the effective date of the final regulations issued by the Mayor
pursuant to section 2(b)(1) of the Clean Energy DC Building Act (D.C. Official Code § 6-
1453.01(b)(1)); or
2

“(v) A project for which all permits necessary to begin construction
were submitted before October 1, 2024, and that was not submitted to GBAC before the effective date
of the Net Zero Modification and Preservation Emergency Amendment Act of 2026, passed on
emergency basis on February 3, 2026 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-585); and”.
(C) A new subparagraph (E) is added to read as follows:
“(E) Maintain compliance with section 2(a)(3)(D) of the Clean Energy DC
Building Act (D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01(a)(3)(D)).”.
(3) Paragraph (3)(B) is amended by striking the acronym “DCRA” and inserting the
acronym “DOB” in its place.
Sec. 3. Section 2 of the Clean Energy DC Building Code Amendment Act of 2022, effective
September 21, 2022 (D.C. Law 24-177; D.C. Official Code § 6-1453.01), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (2A) is added to read as follows:
“(2A) “Level 3 alteration” shall have the meaning ascribed to it in the Building
Codes.”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(A) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a
semicolon in its place.
(B) Subparagraph (B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) A building obtains energy from renewable energy sources in the amount
that would be required by the most recent version of Appendix Z;”.
(3) New subparagraphs (C) and (D) are added to read as follows:
“(C) Renewable energy shall be generated at the building site wherever
feasible; and
“(D) On-site fuel combustion shall not be permitted for the provision of thermal
energy to the building except for backup power generation.”.
(b) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “substantial improvements” and
inserting the phrase “Level 3 alterations” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “; except, that nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the on-site combustion of fossil fuels for backup power
generation in buildings that are essential to protecting public health and safety” and inserting a period
in its place.
(c) Subsection (c)(1) is amended by striking the phrase “newly constructed or substantially
improved covered buildings” and inserting the phrase “covered buildings that were newly constructed
or underwent Level 3 alterations” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
3

The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than 90
days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section 412(a) of
the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788; D.C. Official
Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4